California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Members of the board, with the exception of the Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections, shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. For purposes of compensation, attendance at meetings of the board shall be deemed performance by a member of the duties of his or her state or local governmental employment.

(b) For the purposes of Section 1090 of the Government Code, members of a committee created by the board pursuant to Section 6046.3 or a committee created with the primary purpose of administering grant funding from the Edward Byrne Memorial Justice Assistance Grant Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3751(a)),
 including a member of the board in his or her capacity as a member of a committee created by the board, have no financial interest in any contract made by the board, including a grant or bond financing transaction, based upon the receipt of compensation for holding public office or public employment.

(c) The Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections shall serve full time. The Department of Human Resources shall fix the compensation of the Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(d) The amendments to this section by the act that added this subdivision are effective for grant awards made by the board on or after July 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 28.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.5.

The Director of Corrections, Board of Prison Terms, the Youthful Offender Parole Board, and the Director of the Youth Authority shall file with the Board of Corrections for information of the board or for review and advice to the respective agency as the board may determine, all rules, regulations and manuals relating to or in implementation of policies, procedures, or enabling laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.6.

The Board of Corrections may delegate any ministerial authority or duty conferred or imposed upon the board to a subordinate officer subject to those conditions as it may choose to impose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1017, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.

The Corrections Standards Authority shall be the means whereby the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may correlate its individual programs for adults and youths under its jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 58.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

6027.

(a) It shall be the duty of the Board of State and Community Corrections to collect and maintain available information and data about state and community correctional policies, practices, capacities, and needs, including, but not limited to, prevention, intervention, suppression, supervision, and incapacitation, as they relate to both adult corrections, juvenile justice, and gang problems. The board shall seek to collect and make publicly available up-to-date data and information reflecting the impact of state and community correctional, juvenile justice, and gang-related policies and practices enacted in the state, as well as information and data concerning promising and evidence-based practices from other jurisdictions.

(b) Consistent with subdivision (c) of
 Section 6024, the board shall also:

(1) Develop recommendations for the improvement of criminal justice and delinquency and gang prevention activity throughout the state.

(2) Identify, promote, and provide technical assistance relating to evidence-based programs, practices, and promising and innovative projects consistent with the mission of the board.

(3) Develop definitions of key terms, including, but not limited to, “recidivism,” “average daily population,” “treatment program completion rates,” and any other terms deemed relevant in order to facilitate consistency in local data collection, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based practices, promising evidence-based practices, and evidence-based programs. In developing these definitions, the board shall consult with the following stakeholders and
 experts:

(A) A county supervisor or county administrative officer, selected after conferring with the California State Association of Counties.

(B) A county sheriff, selected after conferring with the California State Sheriffs’ Association.

(C) A chief probation officer, selected after conferring with the Chief Probation Officers of California.

(D) A district attorney, selected after conferring with the California District Attorneys Association.

(E) A public defender, selected after conferring with the California Public Defenders Association.

(F) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(G) A representative from the Administrative Office of the Courts.

(H) A representative from a nonpartisan, nonprofit policy institute with experience and involvement in research and data relating to California’s criminal justice system.

(I) A representative from a nonprofit agency providing comprehensive reentry services.

(4) Receive and disburse federal funds, and perform all necessary and appropriate services in the performance of its duties as established by federal acts.

(5) Develop comprehensive, unified, and orderly procedures to ensure that applications for grants are processed fairly, efficiently, and in a manner consistent with the mission of the board.

(6) Identify delinquency and gang intervention and prevention grants that have the same or similar program purpose, are allocated to the same entities, serve the same target populations, and have the same desired outcomes for the purpose of consolidating grant funds and programs and moving toward a unified single delinquency intervention and prevention grant application process in adherence with all applicable federal guidelines and mandates.

(7) Cooperate with and render technical assistance to the Legislature, state agencies, units of general local government, combinations of those units, or other public or private agencies, organizations, or institutions in matters relating to criminal justice and delinquency prevention.

(8) Develop incentives for units of local government to develop comprehensive regional
 partnerships whereby adjacent jurisdictions pool grant funds in order to deliver services, such as job training and employment opportunities, to a broader target population, including at-promise youth, and maximize the impact of state funds at the local level.

(9) Conduct evaluation studies of the programs and activities assisted by the federal acts.

(10) Identify and evaluate state, local, and federal gang and youth violence suppression, intervention, and prevention programs and strategies, along with funding for those efforts. The board shall assess and make recommendations for the coordination of the state’s programs, strategies, and funding that address gang and youth violence in a manner that maximizes the effectiveness and coordination of those programs, strategies, and resources. By January 1, 2014, the board shall develop funding allocation policies to ensure that within
 three years no less than 70 percent of funding for gang and youth violence suppression, intervention, and prevention programs and strategies is used in programs that utilize promising and proven evidence-based principles and practices. The board shall communicate with local agencies and programs in an effort to promote the best evidence-based principles and practices for addressing gang and youth violence through suppression, intervention, and prevention.

(11) The board shall collect from each county the plan submitted pursuant to Section 1230.1 within two months of adoption by the county boards of supervisors.

(12) Commencing on and after July 1, 2012, the board, in consultation with the Administrative Office of the Courts, the California State Association of Counties, the California State Sheriffs’ Association, and the Chief Probation Officers of California, shall support the development and implementation of first phase baseline and ongoing data collection instruments to reflect the local impact of Chapter 15 of the Statutes of 2011, specifically related to dispositions for felony offenders and postrelease community supervision. The board shall make any data collected pursuant to this paragraph available on the board’s internet website. It is the intent of the Legislature that the board promote collaboration and the reduction of duplication of data collection and reporting efforts where possible.

(c) The board may do either of the following:

(1) Collect, evaluate, publish, and disseminate statistics and other information on the condition and progress of criminal justice in the state.

(2) Perform other functions and duties as required by federal acts, rules, regulations, or guidelines in acting as the administrative office of the state planning agency for distribution of federal grants.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to include, in the provisions set forth in this section, funds already designated to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to Section 30025 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 15.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.

Upon request of the Board of Corrections or upon his own initiative, the Governor from time to time may create by executive order one or more special commissions to assist the Board of Corrections in the study of crime pursuant to Section 6027. Each such special commission shall consist of not less than three nor more than five members, who shall be appointed by the Governor. The members of any such special commission shall serve without compensation, except that they shall receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties.

The executive order creating each special commission shall specify the
 subjects and scope of the study to be made by the commission, and shall fix a time within which the commission shall make its final report. Each commission shall cease to exist when it makes its final report.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.1.

Each such special commission may investigate any and all matters relating to the subjects specified in the order creating it. In the exercise of its powers the commission shall be subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) A witness at any hearing shall have the right to have present at such hearing counsel of his own choice, for the purpose of advising him concerning his constitutional rights.

(b) No hearing shall be televised or broadcast by radio, nor shall any mechanical, photographic or electronic record of the proceedings
 at any hearing be televised or broadcast by radio.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 902.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.2.

The Secretary of the Youth and Adult Correctional Agency may furnish for the use of any such commission such facilities, supplies, and personnel as may be available therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1437, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.3.

All such special commissions shall make all their reports and recommendations to the Board of Corrections. The Board of Corrections shall consider such reports and recommendations, and shall transmit them to the Governor and the Legislature, together with its own comments and recommendations on the subject matter thereof, within the first 30 days of the next succeeding general or budget session of the Legislature. The Board of Corrections shall also file copies of such reports with the Attorney General, the State Library and such other state departments as may appear to have an official interest in the subject matter of the report or reports in question.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.4.

The Governor shall report to each regular session of the Legislature the names of any persons appointed under Section 6028 together with a statement of expenses incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

6029.

(a) The plans and specifications of every jail, prison, or other place of detention of persons charged with or convicted of crime or of persons detained pursuant to the Juvenile Court Law (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) or the Youth Authority Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1700) of Division 2.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), if those plans and specifications involve construction, reconstruction, remodeling, or repairs of an aggregate cost in excess of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), shall be submitted to the board for its
 recommendations. Upon request of any city, city and county, or county, the board shall consider the entire program or group of detention facilities currently planned or under consideration by the city, city and county, or county, and make a study of the entire needs of the city, city and county, or county therefor, and make recommendations thereon. No state department or agency other than the board shall have authority to make recommendations in respect to plans and specifications for the construction of county jails or other county detention facilities or for alterations thereto, except such recommendations as the board may request from any such state department or agency.

(b) As used in this section, “place of detention” includes, but is not limited to, a correctional treatment center, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, which is operated by a city, city and county, or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

6029.1.

(a) There is hereby created the County Jail Capital Expenditure Fund. Moneys in the County Jail Capital Expenditure Fund shall be expended by the Board of Corrections as specified in this section to assist counties to finance jail construction. Moneys in the County Jail Capital Expenditure Fund shall be available for encumbrance without regard to fiscal years, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, shall not revert to the General Fund or be transferred to any other fund or account in the State Treasury except for purposes of
 investment as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. All interest or other increment resulting from such investment shall be deposited in the County Jail Capital Expenditure Fund, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code.

(b) As used in this section, “construction” shall include, but not be limited to, reconstruction, remodeling, replacement of facilities, and the performance of deferred maintenance activities on facilities pursuant to rules and regulations regarding such activities as shall be adopted by the Board of Corrections.

(c) The Board of Corrections shall provide financial assistance to counties from the County Jail Capital Expenditure Fund according to policies, criteria, and procedures adopted by the board pursuant to recommendations made by the appropriate
 subcommittees of the Senate Committee on Criminal Procedure and the Assembly Committee on Public Safety and after consulting with a representative sample of county boards of supervisors and sheriffs.

(d) In performing the duties set forth in this section, the Board of Corrections and the policy committees of the Legislature shall consider the following:

(1) The extent to which the county requesting aid has exhausted all other available means of raising the requested funds for the capital improvements and the extent to which the funds from the County Jail Capital Expenditure Fund will be utilized to attract other sources of capital financing for county jail facilities;

(2) The extent to which a substantial county match shall be required and any circumstances under which the county match may be reduced or waived;

(3) The extent to which the county’s match shall be based on the county’s previous compliance with Board of Corrections standards;

(4) The extent to which the capital improvements are necessary to the life or safety of the persons confined or employed in the facility or the health and sanitary conditions of the facility;

(5) The extent to which the county has utilized reasonable alternatives to pre- and post-conviction incarceration, including, but not limited to, programs to facilitate release upon one’s own recognizance where appropriate to individuals pending trial, sentencing alternatives to custody, and civil commitment or diversion programs consistent with public safety for those with drug- or alcohol-related problems or mental or developmental disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 155, Sec. 4.   Effective July 12, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6029.5.

The Board of Corrections is authorized to expend money from the County Jail Capital Expenditure Fund, created pursuant to Sections 4412 and 6029.1, on joint use correctional facilities housing county and state or federal prisoners or any combination thereof in proportion to the county benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1101, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6030.

(a) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall establish minimum standards for local correctional facilities. The board shall review those standards biennially and make any appropriate revisions.

(b) The standards shall include, but not be limited to, the following areas: health and sanitary conditions, fire and life safety,
 security, rehabilitation programs, recreation, treatment of persons confined in local correctional facilities, and personnel training.

(c) The standards shall require that at least one person on duty at the facility is knowledgeable in the area of fire and life safety procedures.

(d) The standards shall also include requirements relating to the acquisition, storage, labeling, packaging, and dispensing of drugs.

(e) The standards shall require that inmates who are received by the facility while they are pregnant be notified, orally or in writing, of and provided all of the following:

(1) A balanced, nutritious diet approved by a doctor.

(2) Prenatal and post partum information and health
 care, including, but not limited to, access to necessary vitamins as recommended by a doctor.

(3) Information pertaining to childbirth education and infant care.

(4) A dental cleaning while in a state facility.

(f) The standards shall provide that a woman known to be pregnant or in recovery after delivery shall not be restrained, except as provided in Section 3407. The board shall develop standards regarding the restraint of pregnant women at the next biennial review of the standards after the enactment of the act amending this subdivision and shall review the individual facility’s compliance with the standards.

(g) In establishing minimum standards, the board shall seek the advice of the following:

(1) For health and sanitary conditions:

The State Department of Public Health, physicians, psychiatrists, local public health officials, and other interested persons.

(2) For fire and life safety:

The State Fire Marshal, local fire officials, and other interested persons.

(3) For security, rehabilitation programs, recreation, and treatment of persons confined in correctional facilities:

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, state and local juvenile justice commissions, state and local correctional officials, experts in criminology and penology, and other interested persons.

(4) For personnel training:

The Commission on
 Peace Officer Standards and Training, psychiatrists, experts in criminology and penology, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, state and local correctional officials, and other interested persons.

(5) For female inmates and pregnant inmates in local adult and juvenile facilities:

The California State Sheriffs’ Association and Chief Probation Officers’ Association of California, and other interested persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 163.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.

(a) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall, at a minimum, inspect each local detention facility in the state biennially.

(b) Any duly authorized officer, employee, or agent of the board may, upon presentation of proper identification, enter and inspect any area of a local detention facility, without notice, to conduct an inspection required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 20.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.1.

(a) Inspections of local detention facilities shall, at a minimum, be made biennially. Inspections of privately operated work furlough facilities and programs shall be made biennially unless the work furlough administrator requests an earlier inspection. Inspections shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Health and safety inspections conducted pursuant to Section 101045 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Fire suppression preplanning inspections by the local fire department.

(3) Security, rehabilitation programs, recreation, treatment of persons confined in the facilities, and
 personnel training by the staff of the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(4) The types and availability of visitation, including, but not limited to, the mode of visitation, visitation hours, time inmates are allowed for visitation, and any restrictions on inmate visitation.

(5) Whether the county in which the facility is located received state funding for jail construction pursuant to Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2007, Chapter 42 of the Statutes of 2012, Chapter 37 of the Statutes of 2014, or Chapter 34 of the Statutes of 2016. For counties that received funding, whether the county and facility are in compliance with the applicable requirements and restrictions of that funding.

(b) Reports of each facility’s inspection shall be furnished to the official in charge of the local detention facility or, in the
 case of a privately operated facility, the work furlough administrator, the local governing body, the grand jury, and the presiding judge of the superior court in the county where the facility is located. These reports shall set forth the areas wherein the facility has complied and has failed to comply with the minimum standards established pursuant to Section 6030.

(c) All reports completed pursuant to this section shall be posted on the Board of State and Community Corrections’ Internet Web site in a manner in which they are accessible to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 43.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.2.

The Board of Corrections shall file with the Legislature on December 30, in each even-numbered year, reports to the Legislature which shall include information on all of the following:

(a) Inspection of those local detention facilities that have not complied with the minimum standards established pursuant to Section 6030. The reports shall specify those areas in which the facility has failed to comply and the estimated cost to the facility necessary to accomplish compliance with the minimum
 standards.

(b) Information regarding the progress and effectiveness of the standards and training program contained in Sections 6035 to 6037, inclusive.

(c) Status of funds expended, interest earned, actions implementing the prerequisites for funding, any reallocations of funds pursuant to Sections 4497.04 to 4497.16, inclusive, and a complete listing of funds allocated to each county.

(d) Inmate accounting system data to be maintained on an annual basis by the sheriff, chief of police, or other official in charge of operating the adult detention system in a county or city, including all of the following:

(1) Average daily population of sentenced and unsentenced prisoners classified according to gender and juvenile status.

(2) Jail admissions of sentenced and unsentenced prisoners, booking charge, date and time of booking, date and time of release, and operating expenses.

(3) Detention system capital and operating expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 805, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.3.

The Board of Corrections is authorized to apply for any funds that may be available from the federal government to further the purposes of Sections 6030 to 6031.2, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1789.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.4.

(a) For the purpose of this title, “local detention facility” means any city, county, city and county, or regional facility used for the confinement for more than 24 hours of adults, or of both adults and minors, but does not include that portion of a facility for the confinement of both adults and minors which is devoted only to the confinement of minors.

(b) In addition to those provided for in subdivision (a), for the purposes of this title, “local detention facility” also includes any city, county, city and county, or regional facility, constructed on or after January 1, 1978, used for the confinement, regardless of the length of confinement, of adults or of both adults and minors, but does not include that portion
 of a facility for the confinement of both adults and minors which is devoted only to the confinement of minors.

(c) “Local detention facility” also includes any adult detention facility, exclusive of any facility operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or any facility holding inmates pursuant to Section 2910.5, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3410) of Title 2 of, Chapter 9.2 (commencing with Section 6220) of Title 7 of, Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Title 7 of, or Chapter 9.6 (commencing with Section 6260) of Title 7 of, Part 3, that holds local prisoners under contract on behalf of
 a city, county, or city and county. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as affecting or authorizing the establishment of private detention facilities.

(d) “Local detention facility” also includes a court holding facility within a superior court that is operated by or supervised by personnel trained pursuant to Section 1024 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations. A court holding facility does not include an area within a courtroom or a public area in the courthouse.

(e) For purposes of this title, a local detention facility does not include those rooms that are used for holding persons for interviews, interrogations, or investigations, and are either separate from a jail or located in the administrative area of a law enforcement facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 23.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.5.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “correctional personnel” means either of the following:

(1) Any person described by subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.5, 830.55, 831, or 831.5. 

(2) Any class of persons who perform supervision, custody, care, or treatment functions and are employed by the Department of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, any correctional or detention facility, probation department, community-based correctional program, or other state or local public facility or program
 responsible for the custody, supervision, treatment, or rehabilitation of persons accused of, or adjudged responsible for, criminal or delinquent conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1100, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.6.

(a) Any privately operated local detention facility responsible for the custody and control of any local prisoner shall, as required by subdivision (a) of Section 1208, operate pursuant to a contract with the city, county, or city and county, as appropriate.

(b) (1) Each contract shall include, but not be limited to, a provision whereby the private agency or entity agrees to operate in compliance with all appropriate state and local building, zoning,
 health, safety, and fire statutes, ordinances, and regulations, and with the minimum jail standards established by regulations adopted by the Board of Corrections, as set forth in Subchapter 4 (commencing with Section 1000) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The private agency or entity shall select and train its personnel in accordance with selection and training requirements adopted by the Board of Corrections as set forth in Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The failure of a privately operated local detention facility to comply with the appropriate health, safety, and fire laws, or with the minimum jail standards adopted by the Board of Corrections, may constitute grounds for the termination of the contract.

(c) Upon the discovery of a failure of a privately operated local detention facility to comply with the requirements of subdivision (b), the local governmental entity shall notify the director of the facility that sanctions shall be applied or the contract shall be canceled if the specified deficiencies are not corrected within 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 787, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6032.

(a) There is hereby established within the Board of State and Community Corrections the California Juvenile Justice Data Working Group. The purpose of the working group is to recommend options for coordinating and modernizing the juvenile justice data systems and reports that are developed and maintained by state and county agencies.

(b) (1) The working group shall include representatives from each of the following:

(A) The Department of Justice.

(B) The Board of State and Community Corrections.

(C) The Division of Juvenile Justice within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(D) The Chief Probation Officers of California.

(E) The Judicial Council.

(F) The California State Association of Counties.

(G) Any other representatives that are deemed appropriate by the board.

(2) Members
 of the working group shall include persons that have experience or expertise related to the California juvenile justice system or the design and implementation of juvenile justice data systems, or both.

(c) (1) The working group shall analyze the capacities and limitations of the data systems and networks used to collect and report state and local juvenile caseload and outcome data. The analysis shall include all of the following:

(A) A review of the relevant data systems, studies, or models from California and other states having elements worthy of replication in California.

(B) Identify changes or upgrades to improve the capacity and utility of juvenile justice caseload and outcome data in California, including changes to support the gathering of juvenile justice outcome and recidivism
 information, and changes to improve performance outcome measurements for state-local juvenile justice grant programs.

(2) No later than January 1, 2016, the working group shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature on the options for improving interagency coordination, modernization, and upgrading of state and local juvenile justice data and information systems. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The additional collection and reporting responsibilities for agencies, departments, or providers that would be affected.

(B) Recommendations for the creation of a Web-based statewide clearinghouse or information center that would make relevant juvenile justice information on operations, caseloads, dispositions, and outcomes available in a user-friendly, query-based format for
 stakeholders and members of the public.

(C) An assessment of the feasibility of implementing the responsibilities identified in subparagraph (A) and the recommendations developed pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(3) The working group shall also recommend a plan for improving the current juvenile justice reporting requirements of Section 1961 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Section 30061 of the Government Code, including streamlining and consolidating current requirements without sacrificing meaningful data collection. The working group shall submit its recommendations to the Board of State and Community Corrections no later than April 30, 2015.

(d) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (c) is inoperative on January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the
 Government Code.

(2) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (SB 1054)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6033.

The Board of State and Community Corrections shall, by January 1, 2018, develop recommendations for best practices and standardization for counties on how to disaggregate juvenile justice caseload and performance and outcome data by race and ethnicity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 880, Sec. 3.   (AB 1998)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6034.

(a) There is hereby created the position of Director of In-Custody Death Review within the Board of State and Community Corrections. Subject to Senate confirmation, the Governor shall appoint the director to a six-year term.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2024, the director shall review investigations of any death incident, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.10, occurring within a local detention facility, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.10, and may, upon determination by the board that it is necessary and appropriate, conduct further review of a death incident. Upon that review, the
 director shall make specific and customized recommendations to the sheriff or administrator of the local detention facility who operates the local detention facility regarding those incidents, including changes to policies, procedures, and practices, facility upgrades, staffing considerations, the delivery of medical and behavioral health services within local detention facilities, and operational and capital funding requirements to address the director’s recommendations.

(2) As used in this section, the term “director” includes employees and agents of the In-Custody Death Review Division.

(c) Within 90 days of receipt of the director’s recommendations, the sheriff or administrator who operates the local detention facility shall identify the director’s recommendations that
 will be implemented and shall provide a timeline for implementation and the anticipated cost of implementing those recommendations. The sheriff or administrator who operates the local detention facility shall also identify the director’s recommendations that will not or cannot be implemented, accompanied by an explanation of why the recommendations will not or cannot be implemented. The Board of State and Community Corrections may call upon the sheriff or administrator who operates the local detention facility to respond to the Board of State and Community Corrections at a regularly scheduled meeting to discuss the recommendations and responses.

(d) The director’s
 recommendations issued pursuant to subdivision (b) and responses
 from the sheriff or administrator required under subdivision (c) shall be available to the public. The director and the sheriff or administrator of the local detention facility may, in their discretion, redact these disclosures or otherwise protect the names of individuals, specific locations, or other facts that, if not redacted, might hinder litigation related to the review, compromise the safety and security of staff, inmates, or members of the public, or where disclosure of the information is otherwise prohibited by law. Copies of public reports shall be posted on the Board of State and Community Corrections’s internet website.

(e) Commencing July 1, 2024, and upon appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall employ a sufficient number of licensed medical professionals and licensed behavioral health professionals to participate in the reviews
 described in this section, assist with establishing and implementing health and behavioral health standards for local detention facilities, and review the delivery of medical and behavioral health services within local detention facilities.

(f) (1) In carrying out the duties under this section, the director shall, during regular business hours, have access to, and authority to, examine and reproduce records, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 832.10, of any local detention facility. In connection with duties authorized by this chapter, the director shall have access to the records and property of any public or private entity or person subject to review or regulation by the public agency or public entity to the same extent that employees or officers of that agency or public entity have access. No provision of law,
 memorandum of understanding, or any other agreement entered into between the employing entity and the employee or the employee’s representative providing for the confidentiality or privilege of any records or property shall prevent disclosure. Any officer or employee of any agency or entity having these records or property in their possession or under their control shall permit access to, and examination and reproduction thereof, consistent with the provisions of this section, upon the request of the director.

(2) A local detention facility may withhold records that are part of an active criminal or administrative investigation as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 832.10.

(g) Access, examination, and reproduction consistent with the provisions of this section shall not constitute a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege regarding any records disclosed to
 the director.

(h) For purposes of federal and state law, including the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act, the In-Custody Death Review Division within the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be deemed a health oversight agency authorized by law to receive protected health information for oversight activities, including as described in Section 164.512(d) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations related to the review of an in-custody death pursuant to this section. Covered entities may disclose protected health information to the In-Custody Death Review Division without the authorization of the individual, provided that disclosure is limited to information reasonably necessary for the In-Custody Death Review Division review of in-custody deaths pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 13.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Standards and Training of Local Corrections and Probation Officers [6035. - 6036.]

6035.
